California statutes. Education Code
(2) Source data shall be consistent with data definitions and standards adopted by the governing board. Data providers shall make every effort to ensure source data is of the highest quality before submitting the data to the managing entity for inclusion in the data system.

(b) The managing entity shall work with data providers to ensure data quality, in furtherance of paragraph (8) of
 subdivision (b) of Section 10867.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 8.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10872.

Notwithstanding any other law, records or source data contained in the data system shall not be subject to disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 31.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10873.

(a) (1) The managing entity shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of all employees, prospective employees, contractors, subcontractors, and volunteers whose duties include or would include access to nonanonymized confidential information, personally identifiable information, personal health information, or financial information contained in the information systems and devices of the managing entity provided by the data providers for the purposes of creating longitudinal datasets in service of the data system.
 This information shall be submitted for purposes of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions and also information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on their recognizance pending trial or appeal.

(2) The managing entity shall require a services contract, interagency agreement, or public entity agreement that includes or would include access to information described in paragraph (1), and entered into, renewed, or amended on or after July 1, 2021, to include a provision requiring the contractor to agree to criminal background checks on its employees, contractors, agents, or subcontractors who will have access to information described in paragraph (1) as part of their services contract, interagency agreement, or public entity agreement with the managing entity.

(b) The Department of Justice shall forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation requests for federal summary criminal history information received pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate a response to the managing entity.

(c) The Department of Justice shall provide a state or federal level response to the managing entity pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(d) The managing entity shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for persons listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(e) The Department
 of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing requests pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 571, Sec. 12.   (AB 185)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10874.

Of the funds appropriated pursuant to Schedule (3) of Item 0511-001-0001 of the Budget Act of 2021, upon the order of the Director of Finance, two million four hundred fifty-two thousand dollars ($2,452,000) shall be transferred as follows:

(a) One million seven hundred two thousand dollars ($1,702,000) to the State Department of Education.

(b) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to the California Community Colleges.

(c) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to the California State University.

(d) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to the
 University of California.

(e) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to the Student Aid Commission.

(f) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to the Employment Development Department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 8.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10875.

(a) The data providers shall, and the University of California is requested to, enter into memoranda of understanding for data sharing purposes, as necessary, for the implementation of this chapter.

(b) A signatory to the participation agreement meets the requirements of this section.

(c) This section does not impose a requirement that differs from the requirement contained in former Section 10858, as it read on January 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 1.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Community Recreation Programs [10900. - 10914.5.]

10900.

The purposes of this chapter are:

(a) To promote and preserve the health and general welfare of the people of the state and to cultivate the development of good citizenship by provision for adequate programs of community recreation.

(b) To authorize public corporations or districts having powers to provide recreation, cities, counties, cities and counties, and school districts to organize, promote, and conduct programs of community recreation as will contribute to the attainment of general educational and recreational objectives for children and adults of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

10900.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, school districts which, prior to the effective date of this section, have interpreted their authority as permitting the use of school buses by nonprofit organizations for purposes consistent with community recreation may continue to permit this use under established practices, policies, and procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 341, Sec. 1.   Effective July 25, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

10901.

The following terms, wherever used or referred to in this chapter have the following meanings, respectively, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

(a) “Public authority” means any city of any class, city and county, county of any class, public corporation or district having powers to provide recreation, or school district in the state.

(b) “Governing body” means, in the case of a city, the city council, municipal council, or common council; in the case of a county or city and county, the board of supervisors; in the case of a public corporation or district, the governing board of the public corporation or district; and in the case of a school district, the governing board of the school district.

(c) “Recreation” means any activity, voluntarily engaged in, which contributes to the physical, mental, or moral development of the individual or group participating therein, and includes any activity in the fields of visual and performing arts, handicraft, science, literature, nature study, nature contacting, aquatic sports, and athletics, or any of them, and any informal play incorporating any such activity.

(d) “Community recreation” and “public recreation” mean the recreation as may be engaged in under direct control of a public authority, or any camping or outdoor recreation activity which is (1) sponsored by a nonprofit organization, (2) for the benefit of disadvantaged or handicapped schoolage children, and (3) in a county with a population less than or equal to 45,000 according to the most recent federal census.

(e) “Nonprofit organization” means those nonprofit organizations which, as determined by the governing board of the school district, are unable to pay for the private transportation of disadvantaged or handicapped schoolage children to recreation activities.

(f) “Recreation center” means a place, structure, area, or other facility under the jurisdiction of a governing body of a public authority used for community recreation whether or not it may be used primarily for other purposes, playgrounds, playing fields or courts, beaches, lakes, rivers, swimming pools, gymnasiums, auditoriums, libraries, parks adjacent to school sites, recreational community gardens, rooms for arts and crafts, camps, and meeting places.

Playgrounds, outdoor playing fields or courts, swimming pools, and camps, with necessary equipment and appurtenances for their operation, under the jurisdiction of a governing board of a public authority used for community recreation shall be considered recreation centers within the meaning of this chapter whether or not they may be used primarily for other purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 734, Sec. 7.   Effective October 11, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10902.

The governing body of every public authority may do all of the following:

(a) Organize, promote, and conduct programs of community recreation.

(b) Establish systems of playgrounds and recreation.

(c) Acquire, construct, improve, maintain, and operate recreation centers within or without the territorial limits of the public authority.

No events for which an admission price is charged shall be held pursuant to this chapter, except amateur athletic contests, demonstrations, or exhibits and other educational events.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 76.)
-------------------------------------------

10902.5.

Any individual who willfully, and without just cause, interferes with or disrupts the recreational activities of individuals, groups, or entities granted the use of a recreation center by a governing body is guilty of an infraction, and shall be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200).

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 422, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10903.

Upon the transfer of duties and functions of the county board of supervisors to the county board of education, the county board of supervisors may provide by agreement with the county board of education that the county board of education will perform all or any portion of the duties and functions of the county under this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

10904.

A public authority may permit the use of a recreation center or facility by parent cooperative nursery groups on a nonexclusive and nondiscriminatory basis when such use does not unreasonably impair or interfere with the right of the public to use the center or facility. As used in this section, a “parent cooperative nursery group” means a group of parents who (1) are licensed by a state agency; (2) on a nonprofit basis; (3) to provide recreation for their preschool age children; (4) on a nondiscriminatory basis.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

10905.

The governing body of any public authority may cooperate with the federal government or any department thereof, and the governing bodies of any two or more public authorities may cooperate with each other or with the federal government or any department thereof to carry out the purposes of this chapter, and to that end may enter into agreements with each other, and may do any and all things necessary or convenient to aid and cooperate in carrying out the purposes of this chapter, or to establish, improve or maintain campgrounds or other recreation facilities under the control of the federal government or any department thereof.

The governing bodies of any two or more public authorities having jurisdiction over any of the same territory or over contiguous territories may jointly establish a system or systems of recreation, and may jointly do any act which either is authorized to do under Section 10903. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit any joint or cooperative action authorized by this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

10906.

The governing board of any union high school district located in a county of the third class which had an average daily attendance during the 1971–72 school year of between 17,500 and 18,500, and which, during the 1971–72 school year, had a modified assessed valuation per pupil of between twenty-one thousand dollars ($21,000) and twenty-three thousand dollars ($23,000), may cooperate with community nonprofit associations and corporations to carry out the purposes of this chapter including the acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, and operation of recreation centers within the territorial limits of and under the control of the governing board, and may enter into agreements with such nonprofit associations and corporations to share the costs of acquiring, constructing, improving, maintaining, and operating such recreation centers located on the property of the school district, provided that the board does not agree to contribute more than one-half the total cost of any one project.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

10907.

The governing body of any public authority other than a school district may designate any already existing board, officer, or employee of the public authority to exercise the powers granted by this chapter to carry out the purposes of this chapter, or may provide for the appointment of a board of recreation commissioners to exercise these powers. A school district may appoint one or more members of the board of trustees, officers or employees, to represent the district on a board of recreation commissioners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 91.)
-------------------------------------------

10908.

The board of recreation commissioners shall consist of either five members or seven members, as determined by the governing body or bodies providing for its appointment, who shall serve with or without compensation at the discretion of the governing body. If compensation is authorized by the governing body it shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25) per meeting for not more than one meeting of the commission in any one calendar month. The governing body may provide that the members of the commission shall receive their actual and necessary traveling expenses to and from the place of meeting of the commission and while traveling in connection with the business of the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

10909.

The board of recreation commissioners in each public authority, or the board, officer, or employee of the authority designated to exercise the powers, shall exercise such powers and perform such duties, pursuant to this chapter, as the governing body of the public authority may prescribe.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

10910.

The governing body of any school district may use the buildings, grounds, and equipment of the district, or any of them, to carry out the purposes of this chapter, or may grant the use of any building, grounds, or equipment of the district to any other public authority for the purposes, whenever the use of the buildings, grounds, or equipment for community recreational purposes will not interfere with use of the buildings, grounds, and equipment for any other purpose of the public school system. Nothing in this section is intended to repeal any provision of, or to restrict or otherwise affect the use of school buildings under Sections 40040 to 40058, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

10911.

Every public authority may appoint, prescribe the duties of, and provide for the compensation and necessary expenses of such recreational directors, supervisors, custodians, assistants, deputies, and other employees as it deems reasonably necessary for carrying out the provisions and purposes of this chapter. Only persons employed in positions requiring certification qualifications shall be paid out of funds set aside for the payment of teachers’ salaries.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

10911.5.

(a) Commencing with January 1, 1993, every public recreation program employer shall require each employee having direct contact with minors to immediately submit, or in the case of a new employee, to submit on or before the first day of his or her employment, one set of fingerprints to the Department of Justice. This requirement is a condition of employment.

(b) For the purposes of this section “public recreation program employer” means a public recreation program that is exempt from licensure pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 1596.792 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) The Department of Justice shall furnish a criminal record summary to the public recreation program employer designated by an employee submitting fingerprints pursuant to subdivision (a). The criminal record summary shall contain only arrests resulting in a conviction and arrests pending final adjudication. The criminal record summary furnished to the public recreation program employer shall be maintained by the public recreation program employer in a secured file separate from personnel files.

(d) The Department of Justice may charge each applicant for a criminal record summary a reasonable fee to cover costs associated with the processing of the criminal record summary. In no event shall the fee exceed the actual costs incurred by the department. Nothing in this section prohibits the public recreation employer from paying the applicant charge or reimbursing the charge to the employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1097, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10912.

The governing body of a school district may require persons, other than students, or organizations desiring to use the recreational facilities on school grounds or belonging to a school or the facilities provided by the district at a community recreation center maintained solely by the district to pay fees for the use as the governing body may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

10913.

The governing body of a school district may require persons or organizations desiring to use schoolbuses belonging to a school to pay fees for the use as the governing body may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

10914.

All necessary expenses incurred by the governing body of any school district in carrying out the purposes of this chapter are a charge against the funds of the district from whatever source the funds have been received. All the expenditures shall be made in the same manner as funds are expended for other school purposes.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to change in any way existing laws regarding the use of school grounds or school buildings by governing boards of school districts, except as specifically provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 95.)
-------------------------------------------

10914.5.

The governing board of any school district may establish accounts for community recreation programs established in the schools of the district, in one or more banks. There shall be no more than one account established by a district for any one school in the district. If one account is established for all of the schools in the district which have community recreation programs, the account shall be known as “The Community Recreation Program Account of (insert name of district) District.”

All funds for the community recreation programs, from whatever source such funds are received, shall be placed in the appropriate Community Recreation Program Account established pursuant to this section, and all authorized community recreation expenses shall be paid therefrom. The governing board of the district shall designate an employee or employees of the district to have custody of the account or accounts, who shall be responsible for the payment into the account or accounts of all moneys required to be paid into the account or accounts, and for all expenditures therefrom, subject to such regulations as the governing board prescribes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 112, Sec. 1.   Effective June 29, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. California Academic Partnership Program [11000. - 11007.]

11000.

There is hereby established the California Academic Partnership Program, to be administered by the Trustees of the California State University, in cooperation with the Regents of the University of California, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, and the Superintendent of Public Instruction. The purpose of the program shall be to develop cooperative efforts to improve the academic quality of public secondary schools with the objective of improving the preparation of all students for college. Projects funded under the provisions of this chapter may address improvements in secondary school curriculum and the ability of students to benefit from these improvements. Academic partnership projects shall be distributed throughout the state in order to provide schools located in rural, urban, and suburban areas with access to these services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 620, Sec. 1.   Effective August 15, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

11001.

The Chancellor of the California State University shall establish an advisory committee to assist in selecting proposals to be funded and developing criteria for project evaluation. The committee shall be composed of the following members:

(a) Two certificated secondary school teachers, including at least one junior high or intermediate school teacher, appointed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(b) Two certificated secondary school employees with responsibility for curriculum administration, appointed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(c) One director of a regional consortium participating in the California Student Opportunity Access Program established pursuant to Chapter 113 of the Statutes of 1978, appointed by the Student Aid Commission.

(d) Two representatives of the California Community Colleges, to be appointed by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, at least one of whom shall be a faculty member.

(e) Two representatives of the California State University, to be appointed by the Chancellor of the California State University, at least one of whom shall be a faculty member.

(f) Two representatives of the University of California, appointed by the President of the University of California, at least one of whom shall be a faculty member.

(g) One representative, appointed by the Director of the California Postsecondary Education Commission.

Faculty appointments to the advisory committee shall be made by the appropriate appointing authority through consultation with the faculty senate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 96.)
-------------------------------------------

11002.

The advisory committee shall make recommendations regarding all of the following:

(a) Development of criteria for awarding grants pursuant to Section 11003.

(b) Development of criteria for determining the priority ranking of schools selected to receive assistance under the California Academic Partnership Program. 

(c) Development of criteria for identifying projects which are ineffective.

(d) Development of options identifying additional resources and efforts which promote the objectives of the program.

(e) Development of a general policy for cooperative diagnostic testing of secondary students with assessment instruments commonly used by California postsecondary educational institutions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 620, Sec. 3.   Effective August 15, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

11003.

(a) A school district together with a postsecondary educational institution or a consortium of postsecondary educational institutions may submit a joint application to the Chancellor of the California State University for a grant to fund a project intended to improve student performance in secondary schools. The advisory committee shall give consideration to the following, in addition to its own criteria for the recommendation of programs for funding:

(1) The inclusion of a comprehensive plan for curricular revision or enhancement and instructional change.

(2) The participation of postsecondary campus faculty working as equal partners with secondary school teachers in efforts to improve the academic quality of college preparatory instruction.

(3) The provision of activities and services designed to enhance the ability of students to benefit from college preparatory curricula.

(4) The provision of in-service training designed to increase college aspirations of students from groups with low participation rates in postsecondary institutions.

(5) The inclusion of procedures for the independent evaluation of the program budget.

(6) Plans for the participation of more than one secondary school.

(7) Plans for the inclusion of intermediate or junior high schools in the project.

(8) Plans for the continuation of the project after funding ceases.

(b) Upon receipt of an application submitted pursuant to subdivision (a), the Chancellor of the California State University may award a grant to the joint applicants for purposes of funding the proposed project. Each project which receives a grant pursuant to this subdivision shall provide matching funds from existing funds received from federal, state, local, or private sources or budget increases in those funds, with preference to projects which have the strongest demonstrated institutional commitment. Priority shall be given to projects which serve either of the following:

(1) Schools and school districts utilizing the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 54700) of Chapter 9 of Part 29.

(2) Schools with low student participation in institutions of postsecondary education or with a concentration of students from groups which are underrepresented in postsecondary education, affording priority to those applicants in inverse order of their level of student participation in institutions of postsecondary education authorized to award baccalaureate degrees.

(c) The Chancellor of the California State University, with the assistance of the advisory committee established under Section 11001, and with the advice of faculty from appropriate disciplines, shall establish a voluntary cooperative program for the academic assessment of secondary school students in the state. In developing this system, the chancellor shall take steps necessary to ensure that increased uses of assessment instruments assist in all of the following:

(1) Reducing the demand for remedial programs at the postsecondary level.

(2) Analyzing student readiness for college-level work.

(3) Identifying the academic needs of students for secondary school teachers and counselors.

(4) Encourage and give priority to schools identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 11003 for the utilization of these instruments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 620, Sec. 4.   Effective August 15, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

11005.

Based upon evaluations conducted pursuant to former Section 11004, the California Postsecondary Education Commission may identify projects that are ineffective or not cost-effective for termination. Funds made available as a result of that termination shall be reallocated for the awarding of new grants pursuant to Section 11003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11006.

The Trustees of the California State University shall adopt rules and regulations necessary for the effective implementation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 8.   Effective July 28, 1983.   Section operative July 1, 1984, pursuant to Section 11007.)
-------------------------------------------

11007.

The provisions of this chapter shall become operative July 1, 1984.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 8.   Effective July 28, 1983.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date (July 1, 1984) for Chapter 11, commencing with Section 11000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Early College High Schools and Middle College High Schools [11300. - 11302.]

11300.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that middle college high schools have proven to be a highly effective collaborative effort between local school districts or regional occupational centers or programs and community colleges. The goal of the middle college high school is to select at-promise high school pupils who are performing below their academic potential and place them in an alternative high school located on a community college campus in order to reduce the likelihood that they will drop out of school before graduation.

(b) Each middle college high school shall be structured as a broad-based, comprehensive instructional program focusing on
 college preparatory and school-to-work curricula, career education, work experience, community service, and support and motivational activities.

(c) The specific design of a middle college high school may vary depending on the circumstances of the community college and the school district or regional occupational center or program. The basic elements of the middle college high school shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) A curriculum that focuses on college and career preparation.

(2) A reduced adult-student ratio.

(3) Flexible scheduling to allow for work internships, community service experience, and interaction with community college student role models.

(4) Opportunities for experiential internships, work apprenticeships, and community service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 20.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11301.

(a) The California Community Colleges and the department shall collaborate with each other and with community colleges, school
 districts, and regional occupational centers or programs to ensure the continued success of existing middle college high schools and to promote the establishment of new middle college high schools.

(b) The responsibilities of the California Community Colleges and the department pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, but are not limited to,
 both of the following:

(1) With respect to existing middle college high schools, monitor the ongoing viability of the programs, assist with the resolution of policy or financial issues that may arise, and track specific outcomes for students and schools, including attendance rates, graduation rates, college entrance and attendance rates, and employment rates for those students who do not attend college.

(2) With respect to the promotion of new middle college high schools, respond to inquiries from school districts, regional occupational centers or programs, and community colleges about the establishment of middle college high schools,
 advise local entities on startup costs and ongoing funding mechanisms for the program, consult with local entities on the organizational structure of, and curriculum development for, the middle college high schools, facilitate the completion of any necessary facilities improvements, communicate with local entities at least biannually about the existence of middle college high schools and the availability of the department’s and the California Community Colleges’ resources, if any, to assist with the establishment of middle college high schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 21.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11302.

The Legislature finds and declares that early college high schools are innovative partnerships between charter or noncharter public secondary schools and a local community college, the California State University, or the University of California that allow pupils to earn a high school diploma and up to two years of college credit in four years or less. Early college high schools are small, autonomous schools that blend high school and college into a coherent educational program. In early college high schools, pupils begin taking college courses as soon as they demonstrate readiness and the college credit earned may be applied toward completing an associate or bachelor’s degree, transfer to a four-year university, or obtaining a skills
 certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 372, Sec. 2.   (SB 379)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16. Programs to Encourage Parental Involvement [11500. - 11506.]

11500.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Despite a substantial increase in school funding over the last five years, a significant percentage of the school-aged population, particularly in large urban areas, is learning well below the statewide average and is making only marginal progress at best.

(b) Parental involvement and support in the education of children is an integral part of improving academic achievement. Educational research has established that properly constructed parent involvement programs can play an important and effective role in the participation of parents in
 their children’s schools and in raising pupil achievement levels.

(c) The federal government has recognized the critical role of parents in the educational process and requires parental and family engagement programs as a condition of eligibility for funds under the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.).

(d) The state board has also adopted a policy urging the creation of parent involvement programs in all schools.

(e) The local control funding formula legislation adopts parental involvement as one of its key components.

(f) Research and experience have demonstrated that these programs succeed only when certain
 components are made part of the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 669, Sec. 1.   (AB 1661)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11501.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to ensure that parent and family engagement programs are properly designed and implemented and to provide a focus and structure for these programs based on prior experience and research while maintaining sufficient local flexibility to design a program that best meets the needs of the local community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 669, Sec. 2.   (AB 1661)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11502.

It is the purpose and goal of this chapter to do all of the following:

(a) To engage parents and family members positively in their children’s education by providing assistance and training on topics such as state academic standards and assessments to develop knowledge and skills to use at home to support their children’s academic efforts at school and their children’s development as responsible future members of our society.

(b) To inform parents that they can directly affect the success of their children’s learning, by providing parents with techniques and strategies that they may utilize to improve their
 children’s academic success and to assist their children in learning at home.

(c) To build consistent and effective two-way communication between family members and the school so that parents and family members may know when and how to assist their children in support of classroom learning activities.

(d) To train teachers, school administrators, specialized instructional support personnel, and other staff to communicate effectively with parents as equal partners.

(e) To integrate and coordinate parent and family engagement activities with the local control and accountability plan adopted pursuant to Section 47606.5, 52060, or 52066, as applicable, with other programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 669, Sec. 3.   (AB 1661)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11503.

The governing board of each school district and county office of education shall establish a written parent and family engagement program for each school in the district that receives funds under the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.), as amended by the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (Public Law 114–95). That program shall contain at least the following elements:

(a) Procedures to ensure that parents and family members are consulted and participate in the planning, design, implementation, and evaluation of the program.

(b) Procedures to involve parents and family
 members in developing the Local Educational Agency Plan and school support
 and improvement plans under Section 6312 of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(c) Procedures to provide assistance and support necessary to build schools’ capacity to plan and implement effective parent and family engagement activities.

(d) Procedures to train teachers, school administrators, and other staff on outreach and effective communication with parents and family members as equal partners. 

(e) Regular and periodic programs throughout the school year that provide for training, instruction, and information on all of the following:

(1) Parental and family member ability to directly affect the success of their children’s learning
 through the support they give their children at home and at school.

(2) Explanation of curriculum, state academic achievement standards, and state and local assessments. 

(3) Home activities, strategies, and materials that can be used to assist and enhance the learning of children both at home and at school.

(4) Skills to assist parents and family members in understanding the development needs of their children and in understanding how to provide positive discipline for, and build healthy relationships with, their children.

(5) Developing consistent and effective communications between the school and the parents and family members concerning the
 progress of the children in school and concerning school programs.

(f) An annual statement identifying specific objectives of the program consistent with the requirements of this section.

(g) An annual review and assessment of the program’s progress in meeting those objectives. Parents shall be made aware of the existence of this review and assessment through regular school communications mechanisms and shall be given a copy upon the parent’s request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 669, Sec. 4.   (AB 1661)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11504.

The governing board of each school district shall adopt a policy on parent involvement, consistent with the purposes and goals set forth in Section 11502, for each school not governed by Section 11503.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1400, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11505.
